Mississippi, session 2026, HB860.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The holder of an on-premises retailer's permit under Section 67-1-51(c) shall have at least one (1) breath analysis device that measures blood alcohol content, that, upon request by a patron, may be used to test the patron's blood alcohol content. (2)  The holder of an on-premises retailer's permit under Section 67-1-51(c) shall not be liable for any negative reading, or false or incorrect reading, as a result of the blood alcohol content testing. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.